Illinois, session 104th, HB3009.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by adding Section 522-82.5 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/22-82.5 new)7    Sec. 22-82.5. Parental notification of reading deficiency. 8Immediately upon the determination of a substantial deficiency 9in reading or the characteristics of dyslexia, as defined in 10subsection (a) of Section 2-3.16, based upon (i) screening, 11diagnostic, progress monitoring, or assessment data, (ii) 12statewide assessments, or (iii) teacher observations, the 13parent or legal guardian of a student in grades 1 through 3 who 14exhibits a substantial deficiency in reading must be notified 15in writing by the student's teacher of the following:16        (1) that the student has been identified as having a 17    substantial deficiency in reading;18        (2) a description of the services that the school 19    district currently is providing to the student;20        (3) a description of the proposed supplemental 21    instructional services and supports that are designed to 22    remediate the identified area of reading deficiency which 23    the school district plans to provide the student; and  HB3009- 2 -LRB104 08761 LNS 18815 b1        (4) strategies for parents and guardians to use in 2    helping the student to succeed in reading proficiency.